Washington statutes.
RCW 44.20.050

Publication of session laws—Headings, index.

When all of the acts of any session of the legislature and initiative measures enacted by the people since the next preceding session have been certified to the statute law committee, the code reviser employed by the statute law committee shall make the proper headings and index of such acts or laws and, after such work has been completed, the statute law committee shall have published on the code reviser or legislative website within seventy-five days after final adjournment of the legislature for that year and publish as many paper sets as deemed necessary by the committee of such acts and laws, with such headings and indexes, and such other matter as may be deemed essential, including a title page showing the session at which such acts were passed, the date of convening and adjournment of the session, and any other matter deemed proper, including a certificate by the secretary of state of such referendum measures as may have been enacted by the people since the next preceding session.

[ 2011 c 156 s 6; 2006 c 46 s 2; 1982 1st ex.s. c 32 s 4; 1969 c 6 s 4; 1951 c 157 s 18; 1915 c 27 s 1; 1907 c 136 s 5; RRS s 8200.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Finding—Intent—2011 c 156: See note following RCW 1.08.080.